Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-496
Violation of law; revocation of operator's license; duties of director and Nebraska State Patrol.

Upon conviction of any person in any court within this state of any violation of (1) any law of this state pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles or (2) any city or village ordinance pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle in such a manner as to endanger life, limb, or property, except for operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or any drug, the judge of such court may, in his or her discretion, order the revocation of the operator's license of such convicted person to operate a motor vehicle for any purpose for a period of time not less than ten days nor more than one year, unless a greater period of revocation is made mandatory by other provisions of law, or may impound the license for a period of not more than ninety days and order that such person not operate a motor vehicle during the period such license is impounded. Such judge shall immediately notify in detail the director of the action and findings of the court as provided for in sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04. If the judgment of conviction provides for the revocation of the person's operator's license, the director shall immediately revoke the license and make available to the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety an updated record of such revocation. It shall then be the duty of the Nebraska State Patrol to enforce the conditions of such revocation recited in any judgment of conviction.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 12, p. 518;

C.S.1929, § 60-412;

Laws 1937, c. 140, § 2, p. 505;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 2, p. 470;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-412;

R.S.1943, § 60-427;

Laws 1947, c. 148, § 4, p. 411;

Laws 1957, c. 274, § 1, p. 1000;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 40, p. 1273;

Laws 1969, c. 508, § 1, p. 2085;

Laws 1969, c. 509, § 1, p. 2087;

Laws 1973, LB 4, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 153, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-427;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 73;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 16.

This section authorizes suspension of operator's license for endangering life, limb, or property on charge under appropriate statute or ordinance, not for speeding alone. State v. Mann, 196 Neb. 824, 246 N.W.2d 604 (1976).

A municipal court is authorized to suspend a driver's license upon conviction under a city or village ordinance for operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. State v. Lookabill, 176 Neb. 415, 126 N.W.2d 403 (1964).

Revocation of driver's license does not apply to a simple charge of speeding. Olson v. State, 160 Neb. 604, 71 N.W.2d 124 (1955).

On conviction of speeding, driver's license may be suspended. Hyslop v. State, 159 Neb. 802, 68 N.W.2d 698 (1955).

Suspension of driver's license as part of sentence was authorized. Kroger v. State, 158 Neb. 73, 62 N.W.2d 312 (1954).

License to drive motor vehicle is not a contract between state and licensee which cannot be revoked, and driver's license can be revoked for one year upon his conviction of driving while intoxicated. Smith v. State, 124 Neb. 587, 247 N.W. 421 (1933).